Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5358.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-34.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-34.1 entitled
"Commercial Sexual Activity" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-34.1-2. Prostitution.
(a) A person is guilty of prostitution when such person engages, or agrees, or offers to
engage in sexual conduct with another person in return for a fee. Any person found guilty under
this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to imprisonment for a
term not exceeding six (6) months, or to a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(b) Any person found guilty of a subsequent offense under this section shall be subject to
imprisonment for a term of not more than one year, or a fine of not less than five hundred dollars
($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(c) In any prosecution for a violation under this section where the immunity provided by §
11-34.1-15(a) is not applicable, it shall be an affirmative defense if the accused was forced to
commit a commercial sexual activity by:
(1) Being threatened or subjected to physical harm;
(2) Being physically restrained or threatened to be physically restrained;
(3) Being subject to threats of abuse of law or legal process;
(4) Being subject to destruction, concealment, removal, or confiscation, of any passport or
other immigration document or any other actual or purported governmental identification

document; or
(5) Being subject to intimidation in which the accused’s physical well being was perceived
as threatened.
SECTION 2. Chapter 11-34.1 of the General Laws entitled "Commercial Sexual Activity"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
11-34.1-15. Immunity from citation, arrest, or prosecution.
(a) A person shall not be cited, arrested, or prosecuted for a violation of § 11-34.1-2, or §
11-34.1-4 if:
(1) The person witnessed or was a victim of a crime or becomes aware that another person
was a victim of a crime, and then promptly reports it to law enforcement in good faith or assists or
attempts to assist by cooperating in the investigation or prosecution of the crime including by
providing truthful testimony; and
(2) The commission or attempted commission of the crime occurred at or around the time
of, and was related to, the conduct prohibited by those sections of the general laws cited above.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "victim" shall be defined as a person who has sustained
personal injury or loss of property directly attributable to the criminal conduct of another person.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000440/SUB A
========
LC000440/SUB A - Page 2 of 3